Illinois, session 104th, HB1334.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-168 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-168)7    Sec. 15-168. Homestead exemption for persons with 8disabilities.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2007, an annual homestead 10exemption is granted to persons with disabilities in the 11amount of $2,000, except as provided in subsection (c), to be 12deducted from the property's value as equalized or assessed by 13the Department of Revenue. The person with a disability shall 14receive the homestead exemption upon meeting the following 15requirements:16        (1) The property must be occupied as the primary 17    residence by the person with a disability.18        (2) The person with a disability must be liable for 19    paying the real estate taxes on the property.20        (3) The person with a disability must be an owner of 21    record of the property or have a legal or equitable 22    interest in the property as evidenced by a written 23    instrument. In the case of a leasehold interest in   HB1334- 2 -LRB104 03318 HLH 13340 b1    property, the lease must be for a single family residence.2    A person who has a disability during the taxable year is 3eligible to apply for this homestead exemption during that 4taxable year. Application must be made during the application 5period in effect for the county of residence. If a homestead 6exemption has been granted under this Section and the person 7awarded the exemption subsequently becomes a resident of a 8facility licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the 9Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 10ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, then the exemption 11shall continue (i) so long as the residence continues to be 12occupied by the qualifying person's spouse or (ii) if the 13residence remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person 14qualified for the homestead exemption.15    (b) For the purposes of this Section, "person with a 16disability" means a person unable to engage in any substantial 17gainful activity by reason of a medically determinable 18physical or mental impairment which can be expected to result 19in death or has lasted or can be expected to last for a 20continuous period of not less than 12 months. Persons with 21disabilities filing claims under this Act shall submit proof 22of disability in such form and manner as the Department shall 23by rule and regulation prescribe. Proof that a claimant is 24eligible to receive disability benefits under the Federal 25Social Security Act shall constitute proof of disability for 26purposes of this Act. Issuance of an Illinois Person with a   HB1334- 3 -LRB104 03318 HLH 13340 b1Disability Identification Card stating that the claimant is 2under a Class 2 disability, as defined in Section 4A of the 3Illinois Identification Card Act, shall constitute proof that 4the person named thereon is a person with a disability for 5purposes of this Act. A person with a disability not covered 6under the Federal Social Security Act and not presenting an 7Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card stating 8that the claimant is under a Class 2 disability shall be 9examined by a physician, optometrist (if the person qualifies 10because of a visual disability), advanced practice registered 11nurse, or physician assistant designated by the Department, 12and his status as a person with a disability determined using 13the same standards as used by the Social Security 14Administration. The costs of any required examination shall be 15borne by the claimant.16    (c) For land improved with (i) an apartment building owned 17and operated as a cooperative or (ii) a life care facility as 18defined under Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities Act that is 19considered to be a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 20value of the property, as equalized or assessed by the 21Department, shall be multiplied by the number of apartments or 22units occupied by a person with a disability. The person with a 23disability shall receive the homestead exemption upon meeting 24the following requirements:25        (1) The property must be occupied as the primary 26    residence by the person with a disability.  HB1334- 4 -LRB104 03318 HLH 13340 b1        (2) The person with a disability must be liable by 2    contract with the owner or owners of record for paying the 3    apportioned property taxes on the property of the 4    cooperative or life care facility. In the case of a life 5    care facility, the person with a disability must be liable 6    for paying the apportioned property taxes under a life 7    care contract as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care 8    Facilities Act.9        (3) The person with a disability must be an owner of 10    record of a legal or equitable interest in the cooperative 11    apartment building. A leasehold interest does not meet 12    this requirement. 13If a homestead exemption is granted under this subsection, the 14cooperative association or management firm shall credit the 15savings resulting from the exemption to the apportioned tax 16liability of the qualifying person with a disability. The 17chief county assessment officer may request reasonable proof 18that the association or firm has properly credited the 19exemption. A person who willfully refuses to credit an 20exemption to the qualified person with a disability is guilty 21of a Class B misdemeanor. 22    (c-5) Beginning with taxable year 2026, if the person with 23a disability is eligible to receive disability benefits under 24the federal Social Security Act, then the property is exempt 25from taxation under this Code. 26    (d) The chief county assessment officer shall determine   HB1334- 5 -LRB104 03318 HLH 13340 b1the eligibility of property to receive the homestead exemption 2according to guidelines established by the Department. After a 3person has received an exemption under this Section, an annual 4verification of eligibility for the exemption shall be mailed 5to the taxpayer.6    In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 7chief county assessment officer shall provide to each person 8granted a homestead exemption under this Section a form to 9designate any other person to receive a duplicate of any 10notice of delinquency in the payment of taxes assessed and 11levied under this Code on the person's qualifying property. 12The duplicate notice shall be in addition to the notice 13required to be provided to the person receiving the exemption 14and shall be given in the manner required by this Code. The 15person filing the request for the duplicate notice shall pay 16an administrative fee of $5 to the chief county assessment 17officer. The assessment officer shall then file the executed 18designation with the county collector, who shall issue the 19duplicate notices as indicated by the designation. A 20designation may be rescinded by the person with a disability 21in the manner required by the chief county assessment officer.22    (d-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 23chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 24the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 25that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 26year, provided that:   HB1334- 6 -LRB104 03318 HLH 13340 b1        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 2    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 3    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 4        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 5    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 6    as of January 1, 2019; 7        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 8    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 9    this Code; and 10        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 11    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 12    taxable years. 13    (d-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 14chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 15the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property 16that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 17year, if:18        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 19    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 20    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;21        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 22    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 23    as of January 1, 2020;24        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 25    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 26    this Code; and  HB1334- 7 -LRB104 03318 HLH 13340 b1        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 2    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 3    taxable years. 4    (d-15) For taxable years 2022 through 2027, in any county 5of more than 3,000,000 residents, and in any other county 6where the county board has authorized such action by ordinance 7or resolution, a chief county assessment officer may renew 8this exemption for any person who applied for the exemption 9and presented proof of eligibility, as described in subsection 10(b), without an annual application as required under 11subsection (d). A chief county assessment officer shall not 12automatically renew an exemption under this subsection if: the 13physician, advanced practice registered nurse, optometrist, or 14physician assistant who examined the claimant determined that 15the disability is not expected to continue for 12 months or 16more; the exemption has been deemed erroneous since the last 17application; or the claimant has reported their ineligibility 18to receive the exemption. A chief county assessment officer 19who automatically renews an exemption under this subsection 20shall notify a person of a subsequent determination not to 21automatically renew that person's exemption and shall provide 22that person with an application to renew the exemption. 23    (e) A taxpayer who claims an exemption under Section 2415-165 or 15-169 may not claim an exemption under this 25Section. 26(Source: P.A. 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22;   HB1334- 8 -LRB104 03318 HLH 13340 b1103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.